inc/flattened/excel2fst/VII.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+Ind +%0SgObv +Cnj +VII %<%< @R.Prefix.NONE@ @P.Prefix.NONE@ +Neu +Pos +%0PlProx +%0PlObv +Prt +%0SgProx/%0PlProx +Dub +%0SgProx +%0SgObv/%0PlObv %>%> +Neg

LEXICON Root
VII_Prefix ;

LEXICON VII_Prefix
@P.Prefix.NONE@ VII_Prefix_WB ;

LEXICON VII_Prefix_WB
0:%<%< VII_Stems ;

LEXICON VII_Stems
ate VII_e_Subclass ;
atemagad VII_magad_Subclass ;
bangisin VII_n_Subclass ;
dakaagami VII_i_Subclass ;
gonzaabii:ginzaabii VII_ii_Subclass ;
gonzaabii VII_ii_Subclass ;
inamo VII_o_Subclass ;
michaa VII_aa_Subclass ;
zanagad VII_d_Subclass ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                               !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VII, Stem Type = aa   !!
!!                                               !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_aa_Subclass
+VII:0 VII_aa_Flags ;

LEXICON VII_aa_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VII_aa_NONE_WB ;

LEXICON VII_aa_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VII_aa_NONE_Endings ;

LEXICON VII_aa_NONE_Endings
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininiigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinoogwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinoogobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinog # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininigiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinoogiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:nigwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:gwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:nigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:gobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:nig # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:g # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:nigiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:giban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlObv:sininiwidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlProx:sinodogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0SgObv:sininiwidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0SgProx:sinodog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:sininigobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:sininigobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoogobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoogobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv:sininigoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx:sinoogoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlObv:sininiwan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlProx:sinoon # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgObv:sinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx:sinoon # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlObv:sininiibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlObv:sininiibaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0SgObv:sininiiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0SgProx:sinooban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlObv:niwidogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlProx:dogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0SgObv:niwidog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0SgProx:dog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:gobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:nigobaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:gobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:gobaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv:nigoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx:goban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlObv:niwan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlProx:wan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgObv:ni # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx: # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlObv:niibanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlObv:niibaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlProx:banen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlProx:baniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0SgObv:niiban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0SgProx:ban # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                              !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VII, Stem Type = d   !!
!!                                              !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_d_Subclass
+VII:0 VII_d_Flags ;

LEXICON VII_d_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VII_d_NONE_WB ;

LEXICON VII_d_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VII_d_NONE_Endings ;

LEXICON VII_d_NONE_Endings
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininiigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinoogwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinoogobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinog # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininigiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinoogiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:inigwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:ogwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:inigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:ogobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:inig # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:k # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:inigiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:kiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlObv:sininiwidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlProx:sinodogen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0SgObv:sininiwidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0SgProx:sinodog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:sininigobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:sininigobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoogobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoogobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv:sininigoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx:sinoogoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlObv:sininiwan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlProx:sinoon # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgObv:sinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx:sinoon # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlObv:sininiibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlObv:sininiibaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0SgObv:sininiiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0SgProx:sinooban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlObv:iniwidogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlProx:odogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0SgObv:iniwidog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0SgProx:odog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:inigobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:inigobaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:ogobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:ogobaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv:inigoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx:ogoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlObv:iniwan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlProx:oon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgObv:ini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx: # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlObv:iniibanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlObv:iniibaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlProx:oobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlProx:oobaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0SgObv:iniiban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0SgProx:ooban # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                              !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VII, Stem Type = e   !!
!!                                              !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_e_Subclass
+VII:0 VII_e_Flags ;

LEXICON VII_e_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VII_e_NONE_WB ;

LEXICON VII_e_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VII_e_NONE_Endings ;

LEXICON VII_e_NONE_Endings
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinoogobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinog # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininigiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinoogiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:nigwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:gwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:nigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:gobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:nig # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:g # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:nigiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:giban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlObv:sininiwidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlProx:sinodogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0SgObv:sininiwidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0SgProx:sinodog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:sininigobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:sininigobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoogobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoogobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv:sininigoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx:sinoogoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlObv:sininiwan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlProx:sinoon # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgObv:sinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx:sinoon # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlObv:sininiibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlObv:sininiibaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0SgObv:sininiiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0SgProx:sinooban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlObv:niwidogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlProx:dogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0SgObv:niwidog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0SgProx:dog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:nigobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:nigobaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:gobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:gobaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv:nigoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx:goban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlObv:niwan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlProx:wan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgObv:ni # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx: # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlObv:niibanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlObv:niibaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlProx:banen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlProx:baniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0SgObv:niiban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0SgProx:ban # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                              !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VII, Stem Type = i   !!
!!                                              !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_i_Subclass
+VII:0 VII_i_Flags ;

LEXICON VII_i_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VII_i_NONE_WB ;

LEXICON VII_i_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VII_i_NONE_Endings ;

LEXICON VII_i_NONE_Endings
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinog # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:g # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgObv:sinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx:sinoon # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgObv:nini # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx:n # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                               !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VII, Stem Type = ii   !!
!!                                               !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_ii_Subclass
+VII:0 VII_ii_Flags ;

LEXICON VII_ii_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VII_ii_NONE_WB ;

LEXICON VII_ii_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VII_ii_NONE_Endings ;

LEXICON VII_ii_NONE_Endings
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininiigwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinoogwen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinoogobanen # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininig # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinog # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:sininigiban # ;
+Cnj+Neg+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:sinoogiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:nigwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:gwen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:nigobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:gobanen # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:nig # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:g # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgObv/%0PlObv:nigiban # ;
+Cnj+Pos+Prt+%0SgProx/%0PlProx:giban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlObv:sininiwidogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0PlProx:sinodogenan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0SgObv:sininiwidog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+%0SgProx:sinodog # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:sininigobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:sininigobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoogobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoogobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv:sininigoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx:sinoogoban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlObv:sininiwan # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0PlProx:sinoon # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgObv:sinini # ;
+Ind+Neg+Neu+%0SgProx:sinoon # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlObv:sininiibanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlObv:sininiibaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoobanen # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0PlProx:sinoobaniin # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0SgObv:sininiiban # ;
+Ind+Neg+Prt+%0SgProx:sinooban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlObv:niwidogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0PlProx:dogenan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0SgObv:niwidog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+%0SgProx:dog # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:nigobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlObv:nigobaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:gobanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0PlProx:gobaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgObv:nigoban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+%0SgProx:goban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlObv:niwan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0PlProx:wan # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgObv:ni # ;
+Ind+Pos+Neu+%0SgProx: # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlObv:niibanen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlObv:niibaniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlProx:banen # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0PlProx:baniin # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0SgObv:niiban # ;
+Ind+Pos+Prt+%0SgProx:ban # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!                                                  !!
!!   Endings: Verb Class = VII, Stem Type = magad   !!
!!                                                  !!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VII_magad_Subclass
+VII:0 VII_magad_Flags ;

LEXICON VII_magad_Flags
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VII_magad_NONE_WB ;

LEXICON VII_magad_NONE_WB
0:%>%> VII_magad_NONE_Endings ;
